Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5420.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 21525. (1) If a hospital conducts a drug screen to assist in diagnosing a drug overdose, the hospital shall include a test for qualified substances in that drug screen. (2) If a hospital conducts a drug screen under subsection (1), the hospital shall report the test result to the department of health and human services in the form and manner prescribed by the department of health and human services. A test result submitted to the department of health and human services under this section must not include any patient identifiers, is confidential, and is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. The department of health and human services shall use the information reported to it under this section to ascertain, document, and publish a report on the number, trends, patterns, and risk factors associated with qualified substances. (3) The department, in consultation with the department of health and human services, shall promulgate rules that establish the list of qualified substances for a drug screen conducted under subsection (1). The department shall promulgate rules under this subsection not later than 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. The department shall annually review the list of qualified substances. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Drug screen" means a chemical analysis intended to test a patient for the presence of multiple substances. (b) "Qualified substances" means the substances identified by the department in rules promulgated under subsection (3).